Hawaii statutes.
[§371-18.5] Workforce advisory
boards; established. (a) In addition to any workforce advisory board
established pursuant to this chapter, the director may establish workforce
advisory boards to be placed in the department for administrative purposes only.
Section 26-34 shall not apply to the workforce advisory boards established
pursuant to this section.

(b) The director or the director's designee
shall serve as the chairperson of any workforce advisory board.

(c) The director may designate the membership
of the workforce advisory boards, and the members shall be selected on the
basis of their knowledge, experience, and expertise. The members may consist
of partners, stakeholders, educators, practitioners, and employers in important
or emerging businesses or industries that have been identified in the State.

(d) The workforce advisory boards shall:

(1) Advise the department on strategies for developing
the industry workforce, including recommending projects and programs to promote
the expansion and development of the industry;

(2) Develop a mission, objectives, and goals with
particular emphasis on pre-service programs and opportunities;

(3) Advise the department in developing partnerships
and cooperative educational programs with providers, organizations, and
stakeholders to further the workforce advisory board's mission and objectives;

(4) Coordinate and align workforce programs and
develop strategies to meet worker and employer needs;

(5) Engage employers across the workforce system to
align training with needed skills and match employers with qualified workers;

(6) Provide new and incumbent worker training and
transitional jobs that promote work-based training; and

(7) Align the performance indicators for core
programs, and add new performance indicators related to services to employers
and post-secondary credential attainment.

(e) The members of the workforce advisory
boards shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for expenses,
including travel expenses, incurred in the performance of their duties and
shall serve two-year terms. [L 2015, c 166, §3]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next